Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.4914, subdivision 10d, is amended to read: Subd. 10d. Direct care staff; compensation. (a) A provider paid with rates determined under subdivision 6 must use a minimum of 66 percent of the revenue generated by rates determined under that subdivision for direct care staff compensation. (b) A provider paid with rates determined under subdivision 7 must use a minimum of 45 percent of the revenue generated by rates determined under that subdivision for direct care staff compensation. (c) A provider paid with rates determined under subdivision 8 or 9 must use a minimum of 60 percent of the revenue generated by rates determined under those subdivisions for direct care staff compensation. (d) Compensation under this subdivision includes: (1) wages; (2) taxes and workers' compensation; (3) health insurance; (4) dental insurance; (5) vision insurance; (6) life insurance; (7) short-term disability insurance; (8) long-term disability insurance; (9) retirement spending; (10) tuition reimbursement; (11) wellness programs; (12) paid vacation time; (13) paid sick time; or (14) other items of monetary value provided to direct care staff. new text begin (e) This subdivision does not apply to a provider licensed as an assisted living facility by the commissioner of health under chapter 144G. new text end